Maine, session 132, LD1541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA c. 908-B, headnote is amended to read:
CHAPTER 908-B
PROPERTY TAX STABILIZATION EXEMPTION FOR SENIOR CITIZENS
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §6281, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S, §10 and c. 441, Pt.
D, §§1 to 3, is further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§6281. Stabilization of Exemption from property taxes on homesteads of individuals
65 years of age or older
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §6281, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S, §10, is
amended to read:
This chapter applies only to the property tax year beginning April 1, 2023 and to
property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §1,
is further amended to read:
A. "Eligible homestead" means a homestead occupied by an eligible individual who is
eligible for a homestead exemption under chapter 105, subchapter 4‑B for the property
tax year for which the individual is requesting stabilization exemption and includes up
to one acre of land surrounding the homestead.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §1,
is further amended to read:
B. "Eligible individual" means an individual who, on April 1 1st of the property tax
year for which the individual is requesting stabilization exemption:
(1) Is 65 years of age or older or will attain 65 years of age during the property tax
year for which exemption is requested; and
(2) Is a permanent resident of the State as defined in section 681, subsection 4 and
has owned a homestead in the State for at least 10 consecutive years prior to
applying for an exemption under subsection 2.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §1,
is repealed.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is amended to
read:
2. Application for stabilization exemption; continuation of exemption; joint
ownership. An individual may apply by December 1st to the municipality in which the
individual's homestead is located requesting that the municipality stabilize exempt that
individual's homestead from the property tax assessed on that individual's homestead for
the property tax year beginning on April 1st following the submission of the application.
A new application is required for each year for which stabilization is requested. An
individual who qualifies for exemption under this chapter shall file annually with the
Page 1 - 132LR0593(01)

319 municipality an affidavit, on a form provided by the municipality, declaring that the
420 individual is still eligible for the exemption.
In the case of joint ownership of a homestead, at least one of the residents must be an
eligible individual for the property to qualify for the exemption.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is amended to
read:
3. Stabilization Exemption for eligible individual. If a municipality determines that
an applicant for stabilization exemption under subsection 2 is an eligible individual and
that the individual's homestead is an eligible homestead, the municipality shall stabilize
exempt the individual's homestead from the property tax assessed on the individual's
homestead billed for the property tax year for which stabilization exemption was requested
and continuing until the homestead no longer qualifies for exemption under this chapter.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
4. Transfer of eligibility. An exemption granted under this chapter is not transferable
unless the homestead is jointly owned by the transferee and the transferee is an eligible
individual.
Sec. 10. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §2, is
further amended to read:
5. State compensation. A municipality that has stabilized exempted from property
tax for the homestead of an eligible individual under this chapter may recover from the
State 100% of the amount by which the property tax assessed on the homestead of an
eligible individual in the usual manner exceeds the stabilized amount of property tax billed
under difference between what the assessment on the homestead would have been, absent
the exemption granted pursuant to subsection 3, and the amount of the assessment actually
paid by the eligible individual after the exemption granted pursuant to subsection 3. A
municipality claiming compensation under this subsection shall submit a claim to the
bureau on the annual return required by section 383. The bureau shall review claims and
determine the total amount to be paid to each municipality. The bureau shall certify and
the Treasurer of State shall pay the amount due to each municipality by January 15th of the
year following the year for which the claim for compensation was submitted or within 60
days of the date the claim was filed, whichever is later.
Sec. 11. Evaluation; specific public policy objective; fiscal sustainability.
The exemption provided under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, chapter 908-B,
referred to in this section as "the exemption," is subject to legislative review in 2030 in
accordance with Title 3, chapter 37. The Office of Program Evaluation and Government
Accountability shall submit an evaluation of the exemption by January 15, 2031 to the joint
legislative committee established to oversee program evaluation and government
accountability matters and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over taxation matters. The joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over taxation matters may report out a bill related to the report to the 135th
Legislature in 2031.
Page 2 - 132LR0593(01)

A. In developing evaluation parameters to perform the review, the office shall consider
that the specific public policy objective of the exemption is to decrease the tax burden
on senior residents of this State and allow them to continue to reside in their homes.
B. The office shall also consider performance measures, including, but not limited to:
(1) The number, amount and geographic distribution of the exemptions;
(2) The cost to the State of the exemptions and whether that cost is fiscally
sustainable; and
(3) The potential to expand or otherwise modify the exemption.